Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
SUBPART 1
VOLUNTARY DISSOLUTION

7-80-801. Dissolution - time and notice of dissolution.

A limited liability company formed under this article is dissolved:

Upon the agreement of all members;

At the time or upon the occurrence of the events stated in the operating agreement; or

After the limited liability company ceases to have members, on the earlier of:

The ninety-first day after the limited liability company ceases to have members unless, prior to that date, a person has been admitted as a member; or

The date on which a statement of dissolution of the limited liability company becomes effective pursuant to section 7-90-304.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2269, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 946, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 862, § 33, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-801 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-802. Statement of dissolution.

Upon dissolution, the limited liability company shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of dissolution stating:

The domestic entity name of the limited liability company; and

The principal office address of the limited liability company's principal office.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1463, § 193, effective July 1, 2004.)

A limited liability company is dissolved as provided in section 7-80-801.

For purposes of sections 7-80-405 and 7-80-803.5, a person who is not a manager or member has notice of the dissolution of a limited liability company on the earlier of:

The ninetieth day after the limited liability company's statement of dissolution is on file with the secretary of state; or

The date on which such person first has actual knowledge of the dissolution.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2269, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1463, § 193, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(2) amended and (3) added, p. 863, § 34, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 7-80-806 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-803. Effect of dissolution.

A dissolved limited liability company continues its existence as a limited liability company but shall not carry on any business except as is appropriate to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs, including:

Collecting its assets;

Disposing of its properties that will not be distributed in kind to its members;

Discharging or making provision for discharging its liabilities;

Distributing its remaining property among its members; and

Doing every other act necessary to wind up and liquidate its business and affairs.

A dissolved limited liability company may dispose of claims against it pursuant to sections 7-90-911 and 7-90-912.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2269, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(2) added, p. 863, § 35, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 8-80-807 as it existed prior to 2004.

7-80-803.3. Right to wind up business.

After dissolution, the manager or, if there is no manager, any member may wind up the limited liability company's business, but on application of any member, member's legal representative, or member's assignee or transferee, the district court, for good cause shown, may order judicial supervision of the winding up.

The legal representative, assignee, or transferee of the last remaining member may wind up the limited liability company's business if the limited liability company dissolves.

A person winding up a limited liability company's business may preserve the business or property as a going concern for a reasonable time, prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative, settle disputes, settle and close the limited liability company's business, dispose of and transfer the limited liability company's property, discharge or provide for obligations of the limited liability company, distribute the assets of the limited liability company pursuant to section 7-80-803 (1)(d), and perform other necessary acts.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 863, § 36, effective July 1.

7-80-803.5. Manager's or member's power to bind limited liability company after dissolution.

Subject to section 7-80-802 (3), a limited liability company is bound by a manager's act or, in the case of a limited liability company, the articles of organization of which provide that management is vested in members, a member's act after dissolution that:

Is appropriate for winding up the limited liability company's business; or

Would have bound the limited liability company under section 7-80-405 before dissolution, if the other party to the transaction did not have notice of the dissolution.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 863, § 36, effective July 1.

7-80-804. Disposition of known claims by notification. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2269, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-80-805. Disposition of claims by publication. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2270, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-80-806. Enforcement of claims against dissolved limited liability company. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire part R&RE, p. 2271, § 192, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.